Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.040

Penalty.

Any person, or any agent, employee or representative of a corporation, violating any of the provisions of such order after the same shall have been published or posted as provided in RCW 16.24.030 or, violating any provision of this chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1975 c 38 s 1; 1911 c 25 s 4; RRS s 3071.]